Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1721
Prohibited acts.

(1) No person shall directly or indirectly (a) cheat, defraud, or attempt to cheat or defraud any other person or employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud any other person, (b) make any false report, enter any false record, or make any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact, (c) engage in any transaction, act, practice, or course of business, including, but not limited to, any form of advertising or solicitation, which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person, or (d) misappropriate or convert the funds, security, or property of any other person in or in connection with the purchase or sale of, the offer to sell, the offer to purchase, the offer to enter into, or the entry into of any commodity contract or commodity option subject to section 8-1717 or 8-1718 or subdivision (1)(b) or (d) of section 8-1719.

(2) No person shall sell a commodity contract under the terms of which the purchaser, other than a person referred to in section 8-1718 or subdivision (1)(d) of section 8-1719, finances the transaction (a) through a lender affiliated with or related to the seller, (b) through a lender who directly supplies the seller with the contract documents used by the purchaser to evidence the loan and the seller has knowledge of the credit terms and participates in the preparation of the document, (c) through a lender who knowingly participates with the seller in the sale, or (d) under an agreement which conditions the granting of the loan on the purchase of the commodity from a particular seller.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 21;

Laws 1993, LB 283, § 7.